Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-508
Court, defined.

Wherever the term court is used in sections 46-501 to 46-573, and not otherwise specified, it shall be taken to mean the district court sitting in any judicial district of the State of Nebraska, containing a portion or portions of lands contained in a reclamation district.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 2(6), p. 525.